Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.240

Courthouse facilitator program—Fee or surcharge.

A county may create a courthouse facilitator program to provide basic services to pro se litigants in family law cases. The legislative authority of any county may impose user fees or may impose a surcharge of up to twenty dollars on only those superior court cases filed under Title 26 RCW, or both, to pay for the expenses of the courthouse facilitator program. Fees collected under this section shall be collected and deposited in the same manner as other county funds are collected and deposited, and shall be maintained in a separate account to be used as provided in this section.

[ 2005 c 457 s 15; 1993 c 435 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.